Arkansas, session 2025, SB339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-3-3202(b)(3), concerning the annual
election of the Chair of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight
Committee, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The legislative members of the Child Maltreatment
Investigations Oversight Committee annually biennially shall elect from their
legislative membership the Chair of the Child Maltreatment Investigations
Oversight Committee.

/s/A. Clark







*LJH111*
03-11-2025 13:54:30 LJH111